Utah statutes.
73-10-3.   Organization of board -- Interstate conferences -- Designation of
representative -- Salary -- Compacts -- Ratification required.
The board shall elect a chairman, one or more vice-chairmen, who shall be
members of the board, and shall establish its own rules of organization and
procedure.
The board, with the approval of the executive director of natural resources
and the governor, shall designate a representative who may be one of its
members to represent the state of Utah in all interstate conferences between
the state of Utah and one or more sister states held for the purpose of
entering into compacts between such states for the division of the waters of
interstate rivers, lakes, or other sources of water supply, and to represent
the state of Utah upon all commissions or other governing bodies provided for
by any compacts which have been or may hereafter be entered into between the
state of Utah and one or more sister states. No such compact shall, however,
become binding upon the state of Utah until it has been ratified and approved
by the Legislature of the state of Utah and the legislatures of other states
which are parties thereto.
In acting as such representative of the state of Utah, the representative so
acting shall act under the supervision of the governor, through the executive
director of natural resources and of the Board of Water Resources.  The
director of the Division of Finance shall fix the salary to be paid to the
representative while he is acting in this capacity.
